src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VTI_Class=VTI_aa_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1SgSubj+%0PlObj:nziiwaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1SgSubj+%0SgObj:nziiwaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2PlSubj+%0PlObj:nziiwegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2PlSubj+%0SgObj:nziiwegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2SgSubj+%0PlObj:nziiwanen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2SgSubj+%0SgObj:nziiwanen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj+%0PlObj:nziinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj+%0SgObj:nziinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProxSubj+%0PlObj:nziiwaagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProxSubj+%0SgObj:nziiwaagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObvSubj+%0PlObj:nziinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObvSubj+%0SgObj:nziinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProxSubj+%0PlObj:nziigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProxSubj+%0SgObj:nziigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj+%0PlObj:nziiwaangen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj+%0SgObj:nziiwaangen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+InclSubj+%0PlObj:nziiwangen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+InclSubj+%0SgObj:nziiwangen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+XSubj+%0PlObj:nziiwiingen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+XSubj+%0SgObj:nziiwiingen EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1SgSubj+%0PlObj:nziwaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1SgSubj+%0SgObj:nziwaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2PlSubj+%0PlObj:nziweg EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2PlSubj+%0SgObj:nziweg EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2SgSubj+%0PlObj:nziwan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2SgSubj+%0SgObj:nziwan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj+%0PlObj:nzinig EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj+%0SgObj:nzinig EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj+%0PlObj:nzigwaa EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj+%0SgObj:nzigwaa EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj+%0PlObj:nzinig EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj+%0SgObj:nzinig EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProxSubj+%0PlObj:nzig EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProxSubj+%0SgObj:nzig EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj+%0PlObj:nziwaang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj+%0SgObj:nziwaang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+InclSubj+%0PlObj:nziwang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+InclSubj+%0SgObj:nziwang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+XSubj+%0PlObj:nzing EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+XSubj+%0SgObj:nzing EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj+%0PlObj:maan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj+%0SgObj:maan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj+%0PlObj:meg EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj+%0SgObj:meg EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj+%0PlObj:man EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj+%0SgObj:man EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj+%0PlObj:minid EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj+%0SgObj:minid EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+%0PlObj:mowaad EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+%0SgObj:mowaad EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObvSubj+%0PlObj:minid EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObvSubj+%0SgObj:minid EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+%0PlObj:ng EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+%0SgObj:ng EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+%0PlObj:maang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+%0SgObj:maang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+%0PlObj:mang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+%0SgObj:mang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+%0PlObj:ming EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+%0SgObj:ming EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTI, Class: VTI_am                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary
0:%>%> VTI_Class=VTI_am_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTI, Class: VTI_am                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_Class=VTI_am_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VTI_Class=VTI_am_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GAA-@ VTI_Class=VTI_am_Flags_Prefix=GAA- ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ VTI_Class=VTI_am_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VTI_Class=VTI_am_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTI_Class=VTI_am_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ VTI_Class=VTI_am_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTI, Class: VTI_am                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_Class=VTI_am_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VTI_Class=VTI_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VTI_Class=VTI_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTI, Class: VTI_am, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_Stems
aaboojwebishkan:aaboojwebishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
aandaakwa'an:aandaakwa' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
aasamabiitan:aasamabiit VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
aayezhibii'an:aayezhibii' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
aazikan:aazik VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
agaawandan:agaawand VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
agwaayaabiiginan:agwaayaabiigin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
akwaandawedaabaadan:akwaandawedaabaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
andoojiishkiwaginan:andoojiishkiwagin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
angwaakizan:angwaakiz VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
apabiwaadan:apabiwaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
asekaadan:asekaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
atisan:atis VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
azhiganezhan:azhiganezh VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
baakinde'an:baakinde' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
baapasaabiiginan:baapasaabiigin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
baasinan:baasin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
babaamiweba'an:babaamiweba' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
badagwaniweba'an:badagwaniweba' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bagidendan:bagidend VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bagoneyaakwa'an:bagoneyaakwa' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bajiishkiga'an:bajiishkiga' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bakobiinizha'an:bakobiinizha' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bakwezhigadaawanginan:bakwezhigadaawangin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bapagoneyaabika'an:bapagoneyaabika' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bashkwaakoga'an:bashkwaakoga' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bengwaabika'an:bengwaabika' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bibagizhan:bibagizh VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
biidoondan:biidoond VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
biijidaabaadan:biijidaabaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
biimiskowebishkan:biimiskowebishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
biindigeyaakwa'an:biindigeyaakwa' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
biisizhan:biisizh VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bimigwaadan:bimigwaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
biniskozhan:biniskozh VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bishigowebinan:bishigowebin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bitizhan:bitizh VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
bookoganaandan:bookoganaand VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
booziwebinan:booziwebin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
daashkadaawanga'an:daashkadaawanga' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
dagakinan:dagakin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
dakwaakwa'an:dakwaakwa' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
dawaagone'an:dawaagone' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
debiiginan:debiigin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
dibinan:dibin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
ditibaako'an VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
dootookinan:dootookin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gaakaasiiyaabikinan:gaakaasiiyaabikin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gaashkaabikandan:gaashkaabikand VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gaawandan:gaawand VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gagiigaabandan:gagiigaaband VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gagwejiwebishkan:gagwejiwebishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gashkaabowe'an:gashkaabowe' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gawiwebishkan:gawiwebishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gibiiga'an:gibiiga' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gidashkishkan:gidashkishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
giikishkan:giikishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
giishkizhan:giishkizh VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
giizhiminagishkan:giizhiminagishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gijiweba'an:gijiweba' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
ginjida'an:ginjida' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gizhaagamizan:gizhaagamiz VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
giziiyaakwa'an:giziiyaakwa' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gojizidaandan:gojizidaand VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gopoondan:gopoond VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gwaabinan:gwaabin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
gwekidaabaadan:gwekidaabaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
ikweginan:ikwegin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
inangidan:inangid VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
ishpaabiiginan:ishpaabiigin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
izhinaabidoo'an:izhinaabidoo' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
jekaagaminan:jekaagamin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
jiigikodan:jiigikod VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
maagwaakwa'an:maagwaakwa' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
maamawinan:maamawin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
maawandoogindan:maawandoogind VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
madweyaakwa'an:madweyaakwa' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
mamigowebinan:mamigowebin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
mashkawa'an:mashkawa' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
mayagipidan:mayagipid VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
megwaashkan:megwaashk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
miikwaabandan:miikwaaband VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
mikwaanikaadan:mikwaanikaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
minomaasan:minomaas VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
mitandan:mitand VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
moonikaadan:moonikaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
naabigwaadan:naabigwaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
naajiwebishkan:naajiwebishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
naawi'ga'an:naawi'ga' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
nabagikodan:nabagikod VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
nagishkan:nagishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
nanabweginan:nanabwegin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
naniizaanitan:naniizaanit VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
niigaanaadodan:niigaanaadod VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
niisaakonan:niisaakon VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
nikakamiginan:nikakamigin VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
ningwada'an:ningwada' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
niswegishkan:niswegishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
noondeskadaadan:noondeskadaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
ogoogandan:ogoogand VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
onagindan:onagind VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
ozaawi-zhizhoobii'an:ozaawi-zhizhoobii' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
waasikosaga'an:waasikosaga' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
webishkan:webishk VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
zaagida'aawangwaadan:zaagida'aawangwaad VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
zagaako'an:zagaako' VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
zaswandan:zaswand VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
zhegonan:zhegon VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
zhiiwaagamizan:zhiiwaagamiz VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
ziigwebaganaandan:ziigwebaganaand VTI_Class=VTI_am_Boundary ;
